District of Columbia statutes.
11-2105

Deputies and other employees.

The Executvie [Executive] Officer of the District of Columbia courts shall appoint and remove such personnel as may be needed by the Register of Wills, pursuant to Chapter 17 of this title.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 517, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111

History

1981 Ed., § 11-2105.
1973 Ed., § 11-2105.

Prior Codifications

Near the beginning of this section, “Executive” was inserted, in brackets, to correct a misspelling.

Editor's Notes